src/phonology/smj-phon.twolc
"e:á in certain stem types 1"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 e:á <=  [ Vow: - å ] ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) X4:0 (X4:0) (X8:0) [m|t|d|s i [m|t|s|m m e|h t t e|s k a|s á]] ; ! 1) Compulsory e:á in Px! bárnne : bárnnám
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) X4: (X5: | Q1: )  [ #  | v | n | s | j | t | d | g | b | p ] ; ! 2) Ill Sg (context (1) only in part 2). Barnne-bárnnáj
         [ Vow: - å ] ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 j ; ! 3) Ill Sg Actor nouns. Bargge-barggáj
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;     ! 4) Uneven N.
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) Y2: ;        ! 5) Indicative Present Singular 3rd Final Vowel in verbs. Vuolgget-vuolggá
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) Y3: ;              ! 6) PrfPrc, gállet : gállám
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) Q2: ;              ! 7) gállet : gáláv
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) X7: ;              ! 8) báhko : bágusj, goahte : goadásj
         [ Vow: - å ] ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y7: ;              ! 9) PrsPrc dim.
	     [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) [ Q1:0 | Q4:0 ] X4:0 X8:0 ;        ! 10) 1st, 2nd Gen/Acc Px declension bárnne-bárnám
         [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+  _ Cns:* (%>:) (»:) Y4: Vow ;    ! 11)verb der. allat. vuolgget-vuolgádallat
!         [Cns:|#:] [ a|i|u ] [ Cns:0 Cns: | Cns: Cns:0 ] _ (%>:) (»:) Y5: Cns:+ ; !12) verb Der/(u/a/å)d
         d: i: e: h: t: t: _ (%>:) (»:) Q7: X4: ;
! 2)
!!€ bálggeX4v
!!€ bálggá0v

! 6)
!!€ gálleY3m#
!!€ gállá0m#

! 7)
!!€ gálleQ2v#
!!€ gá0lá0v#

! 8)
!!€ báhkoX7tj#
!!€ bá0gu0sj#

!!€ goahteX7tj#
!!€ goa0dá0sj#

!!$ goahteX7tj#
!!$ go00dá0sj#


! e:á <=> [ Vow: - å ] Cns* _ (%>:) (»:) X4:0 [ j #: | s Vow: ] ;

"e:á in certain stem types 2"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 e:á => [ Vow: - å ] ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) X4:0 (X4:0)  (X8:0) [m|t|d|s (%>:) i [m|t|s|m m e|h t t e|s k a|s á]] ; ! 1) Compulsary e:á in Px! bárnne : bárnnám
        [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) X4: (X5:)  [ #  | v | n | s | j | t | d | g | b | p ] ; ! 2) Ill Sg
        [ Vow: - å ] ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 j ;               ! 3) Ill Sg Actor Nouns
        [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;              ! 4) Uneven N
        [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) Y2: ;                 ! 5) Indicative Present Singular 3rd Final Vowel in verbs
        [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) Y3: ;                       ! 6) PrfPrc, gállet : gállám
        [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) Q2: ;                       ! 7) gállet : gáláv
        [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) X7: ;                       ! 8) báhko : bágusj, goahte : godásj
        [ Vow: - å ] ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y7: ;                       ! 9) PrsPrc dim
        [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) [ Q1:0 | Q4:0 ] X4:0 X8:0 ;                 ! 10)1st, 2nd Gen/Acc Px declension
        [ Vow: - å ] Cns:+  _ Cns:* (%>:) (»:) Y4: Vow ;             ! 11)verb der. alla
!       [Cns:|#:] [ a|i|u ] [ Cns:0 Cns: | Cns: Cns:0 ] _ (%>:) (»:) Y5: Cns:+  ; ! 12) verb Der/(u/a/å)d
        d: i: e: h: t: t: _ (%>:) (»:) Q7: X4: ;

! 1)
!!€ bárnneX4m
!!€ bárnná0m

!!$ bárnneX4m
!!$ bárnne0m


! The X7 rule could be replaced by a general vowel changer, combined with Q1 in
! the lexicon entry for the Dim suffix.


!"e:á in 1st, 2nd person Gen/Acc Px declension." ! bárnne : bárnám, bárnes
! e:á <=> _ (%>:) (»:) Q1:0 X8:0 ;
! The rule for optional e:á does not work. Thus, it is commented out, and
! the Px paradigm only gets ám etc. Return to this issue.


! e:å

"e:å in certain stem types with å as root vowel"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 e:å <=> å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) X4:0 [ j #  ] ;  ! 1) [ADD examples here]
         å Cns:* _ Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;            ! 2) [ADD examples here]
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Q2:0 ;                    ! 3) gådet : gådåv, jåhtet : jådåv. but this is really vowel harmony, as there is an underlying a in second syll, not e. ie. a short å in 1.syll demands å in 2.syll (really is a:å).
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y2:0 ;                    ! 4) gådet : gådå,  jåhtet : jåhtå
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y3:0 ;                    ! 5) jåhtet : jåhtåm
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y5:0 ;                    ! 6) verb derivation
         å ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y7:0 t: j [ [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ]  | Vow: ] ; ! 7) noun derivation låhkke:låhkkåsj
         å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y7:0 X7:0 l ;             ! 8) noun derivation låhkke:låhkålasj
         å ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 [s (%>:) i ([s ([k a|á])|m ([m e])|(h) t ([t e])]) |  j [ # |Cns: ]] ;             ! 9) noun derivation
         å Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) X7: ;                     ! 10) dåhpe : dåbåsj
         å Cns:+ _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) [ Q1:0 | Q4:0 ] X4:0 X8:0 ;
         å ([ 0:Cns Cns: | Cns: 0:Cns ]) (Cns:+) _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) X4:0 (X4:0)  (X8:0) [m|t|d|s (%>:) i [m|t|s|m m e|h t t e|s k a|s á]] ;

	 	! The first subrule gives Ill. sg. of even-stem
! No shorter version here, bec. of no å-å effect
! The second subrule gives oblique of uneven stem
! The third one is vowel harmony, e:å after root vowel å

! 3)
!!€ gådeQ2v
!!€ gådå0v
!!€ jåhteQ2v
!!€ jå0då0v

! 4)
!!€ gådeY2
!!€ gådå0
!!€ jåhteY2
!!€ jåhtå0

! 5)
!!€ jåhteY3m
!!€ jåhtå0m

! 7)
!!€ låhkkeY7tj#
!!€ låhkkå0sj#



! e:u

!"e:u in Verb Derivations" !This holds only for one word (TO)
! e:u <=> Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y4:0 ;
! árret : árrusit

! e:a

!"e:a in Verb Derivation" !not productive
! e:a <=> [Cns:|#:] [ (Vow:) Vow: - [å:|a:|i:|u:] ] Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y5:0 ; ! láhppet : láhpadit

"e:a in Verb Derivation" ! vádtset:váttsatjit
 e:a <=> _ (%>:) (»:) Q6:0 t: j: ; ! láhppet : láhpatjit

! e:0

"e-stem vowel deletion"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
  e:0 <=> Vow:   (%>:) (»:) (Dummy:) #  g:k _ .#.  ; !clitic ge:k
          :Cns _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y8: | Y9: ] ; !in even-syllable verbs, imp 1du, 1pl and short passives

!!€ ielvveY9ut
!!€ 0ælvv00ut




!! !i-stem alternations

!! For i-stems, there is i:á. The alternation is triggered by a combination of phonological content and dummy symbols.

"i:á in Verb Derivation"
!! __@RULENAME@__
i:á <=> [ Vow: - å ] Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Z1:0 ;
! guollit : guollár

"i:å in Verb Derivation"
i:å <=> å Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Z1:0 ;
! gåvvit : gåvvår

!! !o-stem alternations

!!For o-stems there is o:u and vowel deletion. The alternations are triggered by a combination of phonological content and dummy symbols.

!! The duplicates of the three lines of the two following rules are
!! there to resolve the => conflict between the two rules.

"o:u in certain stem types 1"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
o:u  => Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !X4 IllSg. Ællo-elluj
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) (Q1:0 | Q4:0) X5:0 j n ; ! Q1 X5 ComSg. !parenthesis (Q1:0) bec of no CG in certain words. elujn
        Cns:  _ Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ; !Odd-syllable. Oaloj-ålluha
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: ] ; ! Y1=  Y2= Y3=PrfPrc. Dádjot-dádjum
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y5: ; !verb der. (u/a/å)d. Dádjudit (but actually u is part of the der.suffix..)
        Cns:  _ Cns:* (%>:) (»:) Y4: Vow ; !verb der. alla
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X5:0 j n ; ! Com sg of Actor nouns. Årrot-årro-årrujn. -ot verbal actor nouns behave like reg o-stem nouns without cg, therefore o:u
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 j ; ! IllSg of Actor nouns. årruj
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) X7: ; ! báhko : bágusj, goahte : goadásj
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y7: ; ! PrsPrc dim
              _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) X4:0 (X8:0) ;        ! Px áhkko:áhkkum
              _ (%>:) (»:) [Q1:0|Q4:0] X4:0 X8:0 ;        !  1st, 2nd Gen/Acc Px declension
              _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) ([Q1:0|Q4:0]) X5: j n [a [m|t]|i [s|m m e|h t t e|s k a|s á]] ; !Px Com


"o:u in certain stem types 2"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
o:u <= Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !X4 IllSg
       Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) (Q1:0 | Q4:0) X5:0 j n ; !parenthesis (Q1:0) bec of no CG in certain words. 
        Cns:  _ Cns:+ (%>:) (»:) X5: Vow ;  !Odd-syllable
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y1: | Y2: | Y3: ] ; ! Y1=  Y2= Y3=PrfPrc
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y5: ; !verb der. (u/a/å)d
        Cns:  _ Cns:* (%>:) (»:) Y4: Vow ; !verb der. alla
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X5:0 j n ; ! Com sg of Actor nouns elujn
        Cns:  _ (%>:) (»:) Y6:0 X4:0 j ; ! IllSg of Actor nouns
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) X7: ; ! báhko : bágusj, goahte : goadásj
        Cns:* _ (%>:) (»:) Y7: ; ! PrsPrc dim
              _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) X4:0 (X8:0) ;        ! Px áhkko:áhkkum
              _ (%>:) (»:) [Q1:0|Q4:0] X4:0 X8:0 ;        ! 1st, 2nd Gen/Acc Px declension
              _ (%>:) (»:) (Y6:0) ([Q1:0|Q4:0]) X5: j n [a [m|t]|i [s|m m e|h t t e|s k a|s á]] ; !Px Com



!Old o:u rules
! o:u <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [ X4: j | Q1: X5: ] ; !X4 IllSg, Q1 X5 ComSg.
! o:u <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) X4: j ; !X4 IllSg, Q1 X5 ComSg.

"u:o in contracted nouns"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 u:o <=> _ (%>:) (»:) [ Q3: | X6: ] ; !æddnu:ænoj, boahttsu:boatsoj

"o-stem vowel deletion"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 o:0 <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y9:0 ; !in short passives

!! !For å-stems there is å:e and å:i and vowel deletion.  Each alternation is triggered by a combination of phonological content and dummy symbols.

"å:e in Present Participle of even-syllable verbs"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 å:e <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6: [Hyph|[ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | .#. ] | .#. ] ;
         Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6: [ d a
                               | m (a)
                               | n
                               | n a [ m | t ]
                               | [ s t
                                 | n  ] i [ h t t e
                                          | m m e
                                          | s
                                          | s [ k a | á ]
                                          ]
                               | s (k) (a)
                               | s t a [ m | t ]
                               | t
                               | v
                               ]
                                 :0 - X4: (:0 - X8:) [ :0 - s:
                                                     | :0 - m:
                                                     | :0 - t:
                                                     | :0 - d: (a:)
                                                     ]  ; ! All this to prevent change in Px


! låhkåt : låhkke

"å:i in Actor nouns of even-syllable verbs"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 å:i <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) Y6: ( X5: ) j ;
! låhkåt : låhkkijt - but not really å becoming i, its å becoming e becoming i like in a reg e-stem noun


"å-stem vowel deletion"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 å:0 <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [ Y8: | Y9: ] ; !in even-syllable verbs, imp 1du, 1pl and short passives. bårråt-bårru

!! !alternations valid for several stem types
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

"Stem vowel deletion in even-syllable verbs, imp 3sg, 3du, 2pl, 3pl"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 Vx:0 <=> Cns: _ (%>:) (»:) [Y1:0|Q8:] ;
      where Vx in ( å e ) ; ! Moved a-case to another rule to avoid <= conflicts

!!€ ielvveY1up
!!€ 0ælvv00up

!!€ giessaY1up
!!€ giess00up

!!€ bårråY1up
!!€ bårr00up

!!€
!!€


!! !!Consonant gradation rules
